Alabama, session 2026rs, SB105.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) All county commissions and municipal
governing bodies shall annually publish all financial
statements relating to the financial status of the county or
municipality, for the 12-month period ending on the last day
of the fiscal year as established by the county or
municipality. The fiscal statements shall include, but not be
limited to, audits, monthly expenditures, and budgets which
shall be published in a prominent location on the official
website of the county or municipality.
(b) If the county or municipality does not maintain an
official website, the information required in subsection (a)
shall be posted on the website of the Association of County
Commissions of Alabama or the Alabama League of
Municipalities, as appropriate.
Page 1

Municipalities, as appropriate.
SB105 Engrossed
(c) Any rules related to publishing information
described in subsection (a) shall be prescribed by the Chief
Examiner of the Department of Examiners of Public Accounts as
authorized in Section 41-5A-5, Code of Alabama 1975.
(d) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsection (a),
a county commission or municipal governing body may redact
from published monthly expenditures specific line-item details
of expenditures that relate directly to the safety and
security of critical infrastructure as defined by Section
13A-7-4.3, Code of Alabama 1975, or any otherwise protected or
confidential information.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2028.
Page 2

1, 2028.
SB105 Engrossed


Senate
Read for the first time and referred ................13-Jan-26
to the Senate committee on County
and Municipal Government

Read for the second time and placed ................20-Jan-26
on the calendar:
1 amendment

Read for the third time and passed ................03-Mar-26
as amended
Yeas 33
Nays 0
Abstains 0


Patrick Harris,
Secretary.

Page 3